Hawaii statutes.
§624-28 Taking and return of deposition.
The officer, commissioner, or person before whom a witness appears, in a case
specified in section 624-27, shall take down the witness' testimony, in
writing, and shall annex thereto copies of all books and papers produced or
such parts thereof as shall be required, and shall certify and transmit it in
accordance with the laws and practice of the state or other jurisdiction from
which the commission, notice, or other paper emanated. [L 1951, c 199, §3; RL
1955, §223-22; HRS §624-28; am L 1972, c 143, §1(f); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next